Hawaii statutes.
[§420D-5] Corporate purposes. (a)
Every sustainable business corporation shall have among its purposes the
creation of a general public benefit.

(b) In addition to the general public benefit
purpose required by subsection (a), the articles of a sustainable business
corporation may identify one or more specific public benefits for which the
sustainable business corporation was created. The identification of a specific
public benefit under this subsection shall not limit the obligation of a
sustainable business corporation to create a general public benefit. Allowable
specific public benefits for sustainable business corporations subject to this
chapter include:

(1) Providing low-income or underserved individuals
or communities with beneficial products or services;

(2) Promoting economic opportunity for individuals or
communities beyond the creation of jobs in the normal course of business;

(3) Preserving the environment;

(4) Improving human health;

(5) Promoting the arts, sciences, or advancement of
knowledge;

(6) Increasing the flow of capital to entities with a
public benefit purpose;

(7) Accomplishing any other particular benefit for
society or the environment; and

(8) Using the right to exclude, conferred by any and
all patents in which the sustainable business corporation has an interest in
this right through assignment, license, lien, security agreement, or obligation
for the following purposes:

(A) Creating and retaining good jobs within
the State as well as throughout the United States;

(B) Upholding fair labor standards nationally
and internationally; provided that for purposes of this paragraph, "fair
labor standards" shall be construed to prohibit child labor, forced or
compulsory labor, discrimination in employment, restrictions on freedom of
association, and denial of the right to collective bargaining; and

(C) Enhancing environmental protection
nationally and internationally; provided that if the public benefit under this
paragraph relating to the use of patents is specified, section 420D-4 shall not
apply to the corporation and the sustainable business corporation status shall
be permanent, and this specific public benefit shall not be deleted from the
articles of the corporation pursuant to subsection (d), unless the annual statement
of the benefit director concludes that the sustainable business corporation has
failed to pursue this specific public benefit, then the corporation shall have
its status as a sustainable business corporation terminated.

(c) The creation of general and specific
public benefits as provided in subsections (a) and (b) shall be in the best
interests of the sustainable business corporation.

(d) A sustainable business corporation may
amend its articles to add, amend, or delete the identification of a specific
public benefit for which the sustainable business corporation was created. An
amendment pursuant to this subsection shall not be effective unless it is
adopted by at least the minimum status vote. [L 2011, c 209, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next